Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 2
CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION
EQUIPMENT, FACILITY, AND
INSTRUCTION CAPACITY FUNDING

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1264, see section 2 of chapter 308, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-8-201. Funding for technical education equipment, facilities, and instruction capacity - allocation to CTE providers - definitions - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Colorado talent report" means the annual Colorado talent report prepared pursuant to section 24-46.3-103 (3).

"CTE provider" means any of the following that provides career or technical education programs approved by the board:

An area technical college as defined in section 23-60-103 (1);

A community college included in the state system of community and technical colleges pursuant to section 23-60-205;

Colorado Mesa university established pursuant to section 23-53-101; or

A local district college as defined in section 23-71-102 (1)(a).

"Department" means the department of higher education created and existing pursuant to section 24-1-114.

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate ten million dollars from the workers, employers, and workforce centers cash fund created in section 24-75-231 (2)(a) to the department for allocation by the board in accordance with the program approval process identified in sections 23-8-102 and 23-60-202 to CTE providers to expand equipment, facility, and instruction capacity in key career and technical education job demand areas as identified in the Colorado talent report.

Any money appropriated pursuant to this subsection (2) that is not expended or encumbered at the end of the 2021-22 state fiscal year remains available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years without further appropriation, subject to the requirements for obligating and expending money received under the federal "American Rescue Plan Act of 2021", Pub.L. 117-2, as the act may be subsequently amended, as specified in section 24-75-226 (4)(d).

The board shall comply with the requirements of section 24-75-226 (4) and (5) regarding the obligation, expenditure, and tracking of and reporting on the use of any money appropriated to the department and allocated to the board pursuant to this section.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2027.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1264), ch. 308, p. 1873, § 5, effective June 23.